Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) Access to state owned, operated, licensed, and contracted facilities by members of the Washington legislature aids members in the effective exercise of their legislative functions and roles. The legislature recognizes that access to secure facilities, including those requesting to meet with incarcerated individuals, can require advance planning to ensure safety and minimize potential impacts on facility operations.(2) Upon receiving a written request from a currently elected member or appointed member of the Washington legislature to visit a covered facility, the department of corrections, the department of children, youth, and families, or the department of social and health services shall facilitate the visit on the day requested by the member or as soon as practicable, but no later than within 10 business days of receiving the written request. If an agency denies a legislator access to a facility because of a safety concern or emergency, the agency shall submit a written report to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the leaders of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives, and the office of the legislator who requested access to the facility that details the reason for the denial. An agency may not deny a legislator access to a facility by reason of a staffing shortage, tour guide availability, or administrative inconvenience.(3) Access includes a tour of the facility or the ability to meet with a constituent residing in the facility.Â Access to family events at the facility are managed on a case-by-case basis with priority attendance given to family members of individuals who reside at the facility.(4) All visitors to a facility must adhere to safety and security protocols outlined by department policy and staff prior to and during the visit.(5) For the purposes of this section, a "covered facility" is a facility that is owned or operated by the department of corrections, the department of children, youth, and families, or the department of social and health services. The following facilities are also covered facilities:(a) Adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW;(b) Assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;(c) Community facilities as defined in RCWÂ  72.05.020;(d) Group training homes certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;(e) Facilities and homes contracted with the department of social and health services development disabilities administration to provide residential services under chapter 71A.12 RCW;(f) Facilities that provide supported living as defined in RCW 71A.10.020; and(g) State-operated living alternatives as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.--- END ---